Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.0691

Sentencing—Crimes against property—Criminal history check.

Before a sentence is imposed upon a defendant convicted of a crime against property, the court or the prosecuting authority shall check existing judicial information systems to determine the criminal history of the defendant.

[ 2009 c 431 s 17.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.